spellchecker-languagepack-hungarian/dicts/hu_HU.aff
SFX Q   0    jaikkor      [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaikkal      [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaikig       [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaikhoz      [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaikból      [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaikban      [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaikba       [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaikat       [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaik         [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaiig        [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaihoz       [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidéért     [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidévá      [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidéval     [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidéul      [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidétól     [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidét       [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidéról     [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidért      [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidéra      [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidénál     [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidénak     [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidén       [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidéig      [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidéhoz     [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidéból     [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidéban     [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidéba      [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidé        [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidul       [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidtól      [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidról      [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidra       [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidon       [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidnál      [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidnak      [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidként     [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidkor      [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidig       [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidhoz      [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaiddá       [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaiddal      [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidból      [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidban      [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidba       [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaidat       [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaid         [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaiból       [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaiban       [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jaiba        [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    jai          [^auáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    ja           [iuáéóőúűü]
SFX Q   0    ja           [^auáéóőúűü]
